Massachusetts, session 194th, S975.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 30 of Chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph after the first paragraph:-
(a) Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule, or regulation to the contrary,
eligibility for the emergency housing assistance program shall be limited to (1) United States
citizens and (2) lawfully present immigrants who have maintained continuous legal residency in
the Commonwealth of Massachusetts for at least 12 consecutive months immediately prior to the
date of application.
(b) Acceptable proof of legal residency must consist of the following two forms of
documentation, both issued at least 12 months before the application date:
Proof of U.S. Citizenship or Lawful Permanent Residency: (1) A valid U.S. Passport with
a Massachusetts address; (2) A certified U.S. Birth Certificate with proof of Massachusetts
of 2

residency; (3) A valid Certificate of Naturalization or Citizenship; (4) A valid Green Card
(Permanent Resident Card) issued at least one year prior.
Proof of Continuous Residency in Massachusetts: (1) Filed Massachusetts state income
tax return for the most recent tax year r; (2) Valid REAL ID-compliant Massachusetts driver’s
license issued at least one year prior; (3) Utility bill, lease, or mortgage statement in the
applicant's name, dated at least one year prior; Or (4) pay stubs showing continuous
Massachusetts employment for at least one year.
(d) All submitted documentation shall be subject to verification by the Executive Office
of Housing and Livable Communities in coordination with the Department of Revenue and the
Registry of Motor Vehicles. Any attempt to submit fraudulent documents will result in
permanent disqualification from the program.
(f) The Executive Office of Housing and Livable Communities shall promulgate
regulations to enforce this residency requirement, including procedures for cross-agency
verification and fraud detection.
of 2